Maryland, session 2026, HB0891.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
4–214.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Commission” means the Maryland Commission of Correctional
Standards.
(3) “Menstrual hygiene products” includes tampons and sanitary napkins
for use in connection with the menstrual cycle.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0891*

HOUSE BILL 891
(b) (1) The Institution shall have a written policy and procedure in place
requiring menstrual hygiene products to be provided at no cost to a female incarcerated
individual on:
(i) admission to the facility;
(ii) a routine basis; and
(iii) request.
(2) The Director shall ensure that the Institution has a sufficient supply of
menstrual hygiene products available to meet the needs of the incarcerated individual
population at all times.
(c) The Commission shall establish standards regarding the proper disposal of
menstrual hygiene products.
(d) (1) The Institution shall maintain records on the provisions and
availability of menstrual hygiene products to incarcerated individuals.
(2) THE INSTITUTION SHALL MAINTAIN RECORDS ON THE INSTANCES
OF ITEMS DAMAGED OR DESTROYED DUE TO VISIBLE LEAKAGE OF MENSTRUAL
DISCHARGE FROM INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS.
(e) The Commission shall review the Institution’s policy and records relating to
menstrual hygiene products during regular inspections.
(F) THE INSTITUTION MAY NOT SUBJECT A FEMALE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL TO DISCIPLINARY MEASURES FOR ITEMS DAMAGED OR DESTROYED
WITHOUT MALICIOUS INTENT DUE TO THE VISIBLE LEAKAGE OF MENSTRUAL
DISCHARGE.
9–616.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Commission” means the Maryland Commission on Correctional
Standards.
(3) “Menstrual hygiene products” includes tampons and sanitary napkins
for use in connection with the menstrual cycle.
(b) This section applies to local correctional facilities and correctional facilities in
the Division of Correction.

HOUSE BILL 891 3
(c) (1) Each correctional facility shall have a written policy and procedure in
place requiring menstrual hygiene products to be provided at no cost to a female
incarcerated individual on:
(i) admission to the facility;
(ii) a routine basis; and
(iii) request.
(2) The managing official of a correctional facility shall ensure that the
facility has a sufficient supply of menstrual hygiene products available to meet the needs
of the incarcerated individual population at all times.
(d) The Commission shall establish standards regarding the proper disposal of
menstrual hygiene products.
(e) (1) Each correctional facility shall maintain records on the provision and
availability of menstrual hygiene products to incarcerated individuals.
(2) EACH CORRECTIONAL FACILITY SHALL MAINTAIN RECORDS ON
THE INSTANCES OF ITEMS DAMAGED OR DESTROYED DUE TO VISIBLE LEAKAGE OF
MENSTRUAL DISCHARGE FROM INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS.
(f) The Commission shall review each correctional facility’s policy and records
relating to menstrual hygiene products during regular inspections.
(G) A CORRECTIONAL FACILITY MAY NOT SUBJECT A FEMALE
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL TO DISCIPLINARY MEASURES FOR ITEMS DAMAGED OR
DESTROYED WITHOUT MALICIOUS INTENT DUE TO THE VISIBLE LEAKAGE OF
MENSTRUAL DISCHARGE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.